Utah statutes.
70A-1a-310.   Subordinated obligations.

An obligation may be issued as subordinated to performance of another obligation of the person obligated, or a creditor may subordinate its right to performance of an obligation by agreement with either the person obligated or another creditor of the person obligated.  Subordination does not create a security interest as against either the common debtor or a subordinated creditor.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 2007 General Session

